Massachusetts, session 194th, H4183.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding sections 32 to 38, inclusive, of chapter 7C of the General
Laws or any other general or special law to the contrary, the Commissioner of the Division of
Capital Asset Management and Maintenance, in consultation with the commissioner of the
Department of Conservation and Recreation, may grant permanent and perpetual easements over,
under and through portions of property owned by the Commonwealth under the care, control and
use of the Department for conservation and recreation purposes, located in the City of Lowell,
Massachusetts, to the City of Lowell, solely for the purposes of construction, maintenance,
access, operation, replacement, repair, patrol, abandon, and removal of outfall structures and
laying of mainline drains, subject to the provisions of sections 3 through 5 and to such additional
terms and conditions consistent with this Act as the Commissioner of Capital Asset Management
and Maintenance, in consultation with the Commissioner of Conservation and Recreation, may
of 4

prescribe. The property is currently under the care and control of the Department of
Conservation and Recreation and held for conservation and recreation purposes. The portions of
land, over, under and through which the easements may be granted are more particularly
described as three certain parcels of land located along the Merrimack River within the City of
Lowell containing approximately 6,750 square feet of land for permanent and perpetual
easements shown as “Permanent Easement” on a plan of land entitled “Bunker Hill Outfall
Easement Plant” dated December 2024, prepared by CDM Smith and on file with the City of
Lowell. The parcels are a portion of the land described in an Order of Taking recorded in the
Middlesex North Registry of Deeds in Book 3830 Page 70, which the Commonwealth obtained
for recreation and conservation purposes. The parcel is further described in a plan of land entitled
“Lowell Heritage State Park” and recorded in said registry in Plan Book 157, Plan 69.
SECTION 2. The conveyance authorized in section 1 shall be granted only if the grantee
agrees to assume the cost of any appraisals, surveys and other expenses deemed necessary by the
commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance for the transactions contemplated by
this act.
SECTION 3. The grantee shall compensate the commonwealth for the property described
in section 1 through: improvements to department of conservation and recreation property in the
vicinity of the property described in section 1, valued at equal to or greater than the full and fair
market value of the property described in section 1, or its value in use as proposed, whichever is
greater, as determined by independent appraisal; or, in a sum equal to the full and fair market
value of the property or its value in use as proposed, whichever is greater, as determined by
independent appraisal; or through some combination thereof. The exact boundaries of any
property interests to be conveyed by the commonwealth shall be determined by the
of 4

commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance, in consultation with the
commissioner of conservation and recreation after completion of a survey.
SECTION 4. The value of the property described in section 1 shall be as determined by
an independent professional appraisal prepared in accordance with the usual and customary
professional appraisal practice by a qualified appraiser commissioned by the commissioner of
capital asset management and maintenance, in consultation with the commissioner of
conservation and recreation. The City of Lowell shall compensate the Commonwealth in an
amount greater than or equal to the full and fair market value, or the value in use of the
easements as proposed, whichever is greater, as determined by the independent appraisals. All
money paid to the Commonwealth by the City of Lowell as a result of the conveyance authorized
by section 1 shall be deposited in the Conservation Trust. The commissioner of capital asset
management and maintenance shall submit the appraisal and a report thereon to the inspector
general for review and comment. The inspector general shall review and approve the appraisal,
and the review shall include an examination of the methodology utilized for the appraisal. The
inspector general shall prepare a report of the review and file the report with the commissioner of
capital asset management and maintenance, and the commissioner shall submit copies of the
appraisal, the report thereon and the inspector general’s review and approval and comments, if
any, to the house and senate committees on ways and means and the senate and house chairs of
the joint committee on state administration at least 15 days prior to the execution of the
conveyance authorized by this act.
SECTION 5. No instrument conveying by or on behalf of the commonwealth an
easement described in section 1 shall be valid unless such instrument provides that the easement
shall be used solely for the purposes described in this act. The easement instrument shall include
of 4

a provision that shall state that in the event that the easement ceases to be used by the city of
Lowell, or its successors or assigns, for the purposes described in this act, the easement shall
revert to the commonwealth under the care, control and use by the department of conservation
and recreation, upon the terms and conditions that the commissioner of capital asset management
and maintenance, in consultation with the commissioner of conservation and recreation, may
determine. If the easement reverts to the commonwealth, any further disposition of the easement
shall be subject to sections 32 to 38, inclusive of chapter 7C of the General Laws and the prior
approval of the general court. The terms of the easement shall require that for installation,
maintenance, repair or other work performed in the easement area, the easement holder shall
restore the surface condition to the equivalent or better condition as determined by the
department of conservation and recreation.
of 4